Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-55] Other law enforcement DNA
laboratories. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude other law enforcement
DNA laboratories from maintaining local forensic databases and data banks or
performing forensic identification analyses, including DNA profiling,
independent from the state DNA database and data bank identification program.
[L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next